District of Columbia statutes.
50-1704

Seats to conform to federal safety standards.

Child restraint seats shall conform to all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards established pursuant to § 103 of title 1 of the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966, approved September 9, 1966 (80 Stat. 719; 15 U.S.C. § 1392 ).

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-194, § 5, 30 DCR 49
15 U.S.C. § 1392, referred to in this section, was repealed in 1994 by P.L. 103-272, § 7(b). For present law, see 49 U.S.C. § 30101 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 40-1204.
This section is referenced in § 50-1702.